Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1196.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-899.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-899.03. Rules The director shall develop adopt rules and regulations governing standards, procedures, techniques and criteria for conducting and administering hearing evaluation services.